Washington statutes.
RCW 40.07.060

Notification—Removal from mailing lists, exceptions—Mailing rates.

Each state agency shall at least once each biennium notify the addressees of each state publication in or with that publication that they may be removed from the mailing list by notifying the originating agency. Mailings required by a state or federal statute, rule, or regulation, those maintained by an institution of higher education for official fund-raising or curriculum offerings, bulk mailings addressed to "occupant" or a similar designation, and paid subscriptions are excluded from the provisions of this paragraph.

All publications shall be distributed or mailed at the lowest available rate.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 6.]